Virginia statutes. Title 36. Housing.
Article 2. State Building Code Technical Review Board.

§ 36-108.
Board continued; members.

There is hereby continued, in the Department, the State Building Code Technical Review Board, consisting of 14 members, appointed by the Governor subject to confirmation by the General Assembly. The members shall include one member who is a registered architect, selected from a slate presented by the Virginia Society of the American Institute of Architects; one member who is a professional engineer in private practice, selected from a slate presented by the Virginia Society of Professional Engineers; one member who is a residential builder, selected from a slate presented by the Home Builders Association of Virginia; one member who is a general contractor, selected from a slate presented by the Virginia Branch, Associated General Contractors of America; two members who have had experience in the field of enforcement of building regulations, selected from a slate presented by the Virginia Building and Code Officials Association; one member who is employed by a public agency as a fire prevention officer, selected from a slate presented by the Virginia Fire Chiefs Association; one member whose primary occupation is commercial or retail construction or operation and maintenance, selected from a slate presented by the Virginia chapters of Building Owners and Managers Association, International; one member whose primary occupation is residential, multifamily housing construction or operation and maintenance, selected from a slate presented by the Virginia chapters of the National Apartment Association; one member who is an electrical contractor who has held a Class A license for at least 10 years; one member who is a plumbing contractor who has held a Class A license for at least 10 years and one member who is a heating and cooling contractor who has held a Class A license for at least 10 years, both of whom are selected from a combined slate presented by the Virginia Association of Plumbing-Heating-Cooling Contractors and the Virginia Chapters of the Air Conditioning Contractors of America; and two members from the Commonwealth at large who may be members of local governing bodies. The members shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor.

History.

1972, c. 829; 1974, c. 668; 1976, c. 484; 1977, cc. 92, 613; 1993, c. 626; 1997, c. 860; 2003, c. 950.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, the reference to “The Virginia Building Officials Conference” was changed to “Virginia Building and Code Officials Association.”

The 1997 amendment

substituted “fourteen members” for “twelve members” in the first sentence and inserted “one member who is a plumbing contractor who has held a Class A license for at least ten years and one member who is a heating and cooling contractor who has held a Class A license for at least ten years, both of whom are selected from a slate presented by the Virginia Association of Plumbing-Heating-Cooling Contracts” in the second sentence.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 950 substituted “14” for “fourteen” and “10” for “ten” throughout the section, and in the last sentence, inserted “combined” preceding “slate,” and “and the Virginia Chapters of the Air Conditioning Contractors of America.”

§ 36-109.
Officers; secretary.

The Review Board, under rules adopted by itself, shall elect one of its members as chairman, for a term of two years, and may elect one of its members as vice-chairman. The Review Board may also elect a secretary, who may be a nonmember.

History.

1972, c. 829.

§ 36-110.
Repealed by Acts 1980, c. 728.

Cross references.

For present provisions as to compensation and expenses of boards, commissions and similar bodies, see §

2.2-2813

.

§ 36-111.
Oath and bonds.

Before entering upon the discharge of his duties, each member of the Review Board shall take an oath that he will faithfully and honestly execute the duties of his office during his continuance therein and shall be bonded in accordance with §

2.2-1840

, conditioned upon the faithful discharge of his duties.

History.

1972, c. 829; 1974, c. 668; 1977, c. 613; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 152.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 152, effective July 1, 2021, substituted “be bonded in accordance with §

2.2-1840

” for “give bond with corporate surety in such penalty as may be fixed by the Governor” in the first sentence, and deleted the second sentence, which read: “The premiums on such bonds shall be paid for as other expenses of the Department are paid.”

§ 36-112.
Meetings.

The Review Board shall meet at the call of the chairman, or at the written request of at least three of its members; provided that it shall act within thirty days following receipt of any appeal made under the provisions of this chapter.

History.

1972, c. 829.

§ 36-113.
Offices.

The Review Board shall be furnished adequate space and quarters in the suite of offices of the Department, and such Board’s main office shall be therein.

History.

1972, c. 829; 1974, c. 668; 1977, c. 613.

§ 36-114.
Board to hear appeals.

The Review Board shall have the power and duty to hear all appeals from decisions arising under application of the Building Code, the Virginia Amusement Device Regulations adopted pursuant to §

36-98.3

, the Fire Prevention Code adopted under the Statewide Fire Prevention Code Act (§

27-94

et seq.), and rules and regulations implementing the Industrialized Building Safety Law (§

36-70

et seq.), and to render its decision on any such appeal, which decision shall be final if no appeal is made therefrom. Proceedings of the Review Board shall be governed by the provisions of the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.), except that an informal conference pursuant to §

2.2-4019

shall not be required.

History.

1972, c. 829; 1977, c. 423; 1986, cc. 37, 429; 1994, c. 406; 2003, c. 650; 2010, c. 63.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 650 inserted “the amusement device regulations” in the first sentence, and inserted “except that an informal conference pursuant to §

2.2-4019

shall not be required” in the last sentence.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 63 rewrote the first sentence.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

1A M.J. Administrative Law, § 17.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Failure to exhaust administrative remedies. —

Owner’s suit seeking to enjoin a city from demolishing improvements on the owner’s property was barred because the owner’s failure to seek review provided for by §

36-105

, was a failure to exhaust administrative remedies; service of the notice declaring the property unsafe and a public nuisance by, among other things, certified mail to the owner was sufficient. Family Home Servs., Inc. v. City of Norfolk, 72 Va. Cir. 320, 2006 Va. Cir. LEXIS 311 (Norfolk Dec. 5, 2006).

Jurisdiction to hear appeal. —

Virginia State Building Code Technical Review Board lacked jurisdiction to hear an appeal by a homeowners association because the Board lacked jurisdiction to hear cases involving local fire code violations following a final determination by a local board of fire prevention code appeals. Poplar Place Homeowners Ass'n v. Va. Dep't of Hous. & H. Cmty. Dev., 91 Va. Cir. 157, 2015 Va. Cir. LEXIS 164 (Fairfax County Sept. 11, 2015).

§ 36-115.
Subpoenas; witnesses; designation of subordinates.

In any matter before it on appeal for hearing and determination, the Review Board, or its designated subordinates, may compel the attendance of all needed witnesses in like manner as a circuit court, save the Review Board shall not have the power of imprisonment. In taking evidence, the chairman or any member of the Review Board, or its designated subordinates, shall have the power to administer oaths to witnesses. Where a designated subordinate of the Review Board presides over hearings on appeals, such subordinate shall submit recommended findings and a decision to the Review Board pursuant to §

2.2-4020

.

History.

1972, c. 829; 1977, c. 423; 1996, c. 620.

The 1996 amendment

substituted “of the Review Board” for “or the Review Board” near the beginning of the third sentence.

§ 36-116.
Repealed by Acts 1977, c. 613.

§ 36-117.
Record of decisions.

A record of all decisions of the Review Board, properly indexed, shall be kept in the office of such Board. Such record shall be open to public inspection at all times during business hours.

History.

1972, c. 829.

§ 36-118.
Interpretation of Code; recommendation of modifications.

The Review Board shall interpret the provisions of the Building Code, and the Fire Prevention Code, and shall make such recommendations, which it deems appropriate, to the Board for modification, amendment or repeal of any of such provisions. A record of all such recommendations, and of the Board’s actions thereon, shall be kept in the office of the Review Board. Such record shall be open to public inspection at all times during business hours.

History.

1972, c. 829; 1977, c. 613; 1986, c. 429.

§ 36-119.
Rules and regulations under § 36-73 not superseded.

This chapter shall not amend, supersede, or repeal the rules and regulations prescribing standards to be complied with, in industrialized building units and mobile homes promulgated under §

36-73

.

History.

1972, c. 829.

§ 36-119.1.
Existing buildings.

This chapter shall not supersede provisions of the Fire Prevention Code promulgated by the Board under §

27-97

, that prescribe standards to be complied with in existing buildings or structures, provided that such regulations shall not impose requirements that are more restrictive than those of the Uniform Statewide Building Code under which the buildings or structures were constructed. Subsequent alteration, enlargement, rehabilitation, repair, or conversion of the occupancy classification of such buildings and structures shall be subject to the construction and rehabilitation provisions of the Building Code.

History.

1986, c. 429; 1988, c. 199; 2002, c. 555; 2003, c. 650.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 555 inserted “maintenance and rehabilitation provisions of the” in the last sentence.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 650, in the last sentence, inserted “rehabilitation” following “enlargement,” and substituted “construction” for “maintenance” following “subject to the.”